Washington statutes.
RCW 39.114.030

Public improvements.

(1) Public improvements that are financed under this chapter may be undertaken and coordinated with other programs or efforts undertaken by the local government and other taxing districts and may be funded in part from revenue sources other than tax allocation revenues.

(2) Public improvements that are constructed by a private developer must meet all applicable state and local laws.

[ 2021 c 207 s 3.]